Alaska, session 34, SB239.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 06 * Section 1. AS 28.10 is amended by adding a new section to read: 07 Sec. 28.10.068. Registration of legally imported vehicles. If a vehicle is at 08 least 25 years old and was legally imported into the United States, the department may 09 not require that the vehicle comply with current federal motor vehicle safety standards 10 before registering the vehicle under this chapter. 11 * Sec. 2. AS 28.10.221 is amended by adding a new subsection to read: 12 (e) If a vehicle is registered under AS 28.10.068, the department may not 13 refuse, suspend, or revoke a certificate of title based on the vehicle's failure to comply 14 with current federal motor vehicle safety standards. 01 * Sec. 3. AS 28.20.330(b) is amended to read: 02 (b) The proof required by (a) of this section shall be maintained 03 (1) for one year from the date the judgment is stayed or satisfied if 04 the suspension is the person's first suspension under AS 28.20.270; 05 (2) for three years from the date the judgment is stayed or satisfied 06 if the suspension is the person's second suspension under AS 28.20.270; 07 (3) for 10 years from the date the judgment is stayed or satisfied if 08 the suspension is the person's third suspension under AS 28.20.270; 09 (4) during the period the person has a license or nonresident's 10 operating privilege if the suspension is the person's fourth or subsequent 11 suspension under AS 28.20.270. 12 * Sec. 4. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 13 read: 14 APPLICABILITY. AS 28.20.330(b), as amended by sec. 3 of this Act, applies to 15 suspensions occurring before, on, or after the effective date of sec. 3 of this Act. 16 * Sec. 5. The uncodified law of the State of Alaska is amended by adding a new section to 17 read: 18 TRANSITION: NOTIFICATION. Within six months after the effective date of sec. 3 19 of this Act, an insurance company doing business in the state shall provide notice of the 20 provisions of sec. 3 of this Act to the company's customers in this state who maintain proof of 21 financial responsibility as required under AS 28.20.330. 22 * Sec. 6. AS 28.33.100 is amended by adding a new subsection to read. 23 (j) If an applicant does not successfully complete any portion of a driving test 24 required under this section, the department may only require the applicant to retake the 25 failed or incomplete portion of the test. 26 * Sec. 7. Sections 1 and 2 of this Act take effect immediately under AS 01.10.070(c). Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.